fr: Arts et loisirs > Loisirs et arts créatifs > Instruments de musique > Percussions > Percussions à main > Tambours à main > Tablas: Bayans; Dayans; Ensembles de tablas
bg-BG: Изкуства и развлечения > Хобита и творчески изкуства > Музикални инструменти > Перкусии > Ръчни перкусии > Ръчни барабани > Барабан Табла: Барабан Байа; Барабан Дайа; Табла комплекти
pl: Sztuka i rozrywka > Hobby i sztuki piękne > Instrumenty muzyczne > Perkusja > Ręczne instrumenty perkusyjne > Bębny ręczne > Table: Bębny bayan; Bębny dayan; Zestawy bębnów tabla
zh-CN: 艺术与娱乐 > 爱好/艺术创作 > 乐器 > 打击乐器 > 手动打击乐器 > 手鼓 > 塔布拉鼓: 巴亚; 达亚; 塔布拉鼓组
zh-TW: 藝術/娛樂 > 嗜好和創作藝術 > 樂器 > 打擊樂器 > 手擊樂器 > 手擊鼓 > 塔布拉鼓: 巴顏鼓; 達顏鼓; 塔布拉鼓組
ro-RO: Artă și divertisment > Hobby-uri și artă > Instrumente muzicale > Percuție > Percuție manuală > Tobe de mână > Tabla: Bayan; Dayan; Seturi tabla
cs: Umění a zábava > Hobby, hudba a výtvarné umění > Hudební nástroje > Bicí nástroje > Ruční perkuse > Ruční bubínky > Tabla: Bayan; Dayan; Soupravy bubnů tabla
sl-SI: Kultura in zabava > Hobiji in ustvarjalne umetnosti > Glasbila > Tolkala > Ročna tolkala > Ročni bobni > Tabla bobni: Bayan bobni; Dayan bobni; Kompleti tabla bobnov
da: Kunst og underholdning > Hobby og håndarbejde > Musikinstrumenter > Perkussion > Håndpercussion > Håndtrommer > Tabla-trommer: Bayan-trommer; Dayan-trommer; Tabla-sæt
pt-PT: Artes e lazer > Passatempos e artes criativas > Instrumentos musicais > Percussão > Percussão acústica > Baterias acústicas > Tablas: Acordeões Bayan; Dayans; Conjuntos Tabla
vi: Nghệ thuật và giải trí > Sở thích và nghệ thuật sáng tạo > Nhạc cụ > Bộ gõ > Bộ nhạc gõ đánh tay > Trống đánh tay > Trống tabla: Trống bayan; Trống dayan; Bộ trống tabla
sv: Konst och underhållning > Hobby och skapande > Musikinstrument > Slagverk > Handhållna slaginstrument > Handtrummor > Tablas: Bayans; Dayans; Tablasats
el: Τέχνες & Ψυχαγωγία > Χόμπι & Δημιουργικές Τέχνες > Μουσικά όργανα > Κρουστά όργανα > Κρουστά χειρός > Τύμπανα χειρός > Tablas: Bayans; Dayans; Σετ Tabla
fi: Taide ja viihde > Harrastukset ja taiteet > Soittimet > Perkussiot > Käsiperkussiot > Käsirummut > Tablat: Bayanit; Dayanit; Tablasetit
de: Kunst & Unterhaltung > Hobby & Kunst > Musikinstrumente > Schlagbohren > Handperkussionsinstrumente > Handtrommeln > Tablas: Bajans; Dayans; Tabla-Sets
sk-SK: Umenie a zábava > Záľuby a tvorivé dielne > Hudobné nástroje > Perkusie > Ručné perkusie > Ručné bubny > Tabla: Bayan; Dayan; Súpravy tabla
en: Arts & Entertainment > Hobbies & Creative Arts > Musical Instruments > Percussion > Hand Percussion > Hand Drums > Tablas: Bayans; Dayans; Tabla Sets
nb: Kunst og underholdning > Hobby og kreativitet > Musikkinstrumenter > Perkusjon > Håndperkusjon > Håndtrommer > Tablas: Bayans; Dayans; Tablasett
ru: Искусство и развлечения > Хобби и творчество > Музыкальные инструменты > Ударные инструменты > Ручная перкуссия > Ручные барабаны > Табла: Барабаны «байя»; Барабаны «дайя»; Наборы табла
th: ศิลปะและความบันเทิง > งานอดิเรกและศิลปะสร้างสรรค์ > เครื่องดนตรี > การเจาะแบบกระแทก > เครื่องเคาะจังหวะด้วยมือ > กลองมือ > ทาบลา: บายัน; ดายัน; ชุดทาบลา
it: Arte e svago > Hobby e arti creative > Strumenti musicali > A percussione > Percussioni a mano > Tamburi manuali > Tabla: Bayans; Dayans; Set tabla
ja: 芸術・エンターテイメント > 趣味・コレクション > 楽器 > パーカッション > ハンドパーカッション > ハンドドラム > タブラ: バヤン; ダヤン; タブラセット
ko: 아트/엔터테인먼트 > 취미/예술 > 악기 > 퍼커션 > 손 타악기 > 핸드 드럼 > 타블라: 바얀; 다얀; 타블라 세트
hr-HR: Umjetnost i zabava > Hobiji i kreativne umjetnosti > Glazbala > Udaraljke > Ručne udaraljke > Ručni bubnjevi > Tablasi: Bajani; Dajani; Tabla setovi
es: Arte y ocio > Hobbies y artes creativas > Instrumentos musicales > Instrumentos de percusión > Percusión de mano > Tambores de mano > Tablas: Bayanes; Dayanes; Conjuntos de tablas
pt-BR: Artes e entretenimento > Hobbies e artes > Instrumentos musicais > Percussão > Instrumentos de percussão de mão > Tambores de mão > Tablas: Bayans; Dayans; Conjuntos de tablas
hu: Művészet és szórakoztatás > Hobbik és kreatív művészet > Hangszerek > Ütőhangszerek > Kézi ütőhangszerek > Kézi dobok > Tablák: Bayanok; Dayanok; Tablá-készletek
nl: Kunst en entertainment > Hobby's en creatieve vaardigheden > Muziekinstrumenten > Percussie > Handpercussie-instrumenten > Handtrommels > Tabla's: Bajans; Dayans; Tabla-sets
lt-LT: Menai ir pramogos > Hobiai ir menai > Muzikos instrumentai > Mušamieji > Rankiniai mušamieji instrumentai > Rankiniai būgnai > Tablos: Bajanai; Dajanai; Tablų rinkiniai
tr: Sanat ve Eğlence > Hobiler ve Sanatsal Çalışmalar > Müzik Aletleri > Perküsyon > El Perküsyonu > El Davulları > Tablalar: Bayan; Dayan; Tabla Setleri